Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3037.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-11 of the General Laws entitled "Disorderly Conduct" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
11-11-8. Recreational vehicles obstructing vehicle movement.
(a) Whoever, upon any way or in any place to which the public has a right of access, or any
place to which members of the public have access as invitees or licensees whether the business or
commercial property is opened or closed to the public, operates in a reckless or negligent manner
and hinders the movement of other vehicles on such ways with a group of two (2) or more other
recreational vehicles shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than two and one-half (2.5)
years, and a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000). No complaint for a violation of
this section shall be filed pursuant to § 12-10-12.
(1) Individuals who have been found to be in violation of subsection (a) of this section
while masked shall be punished by imprisonment for an additional one year or by a fine of not more
than five hundred dollars ($500) or both.
(2) For the purpose of this section “recreational vehicles” means a motor vehicle designed
to travel over unpaved terrain and which has been determined by the division of motor vehicles as
unsuitable for operation on the public way and not eligible for registration for such use or is eligible
for registration for such use but has not been registered.
(b) Upon a conviction or adjudication by reason of a violation of subsection (a) of this
section, a recreational vehicle used in the commission of such violation or violations shall be

subject to forfeiture, at the discretion of the court of competent jurisdiction.
(1) In all actions where a final order results in forfeiture, the final order shall provide for
disposition of the property by the state, a political subdivision thereof, or municipality in any
manner not prohibited by law, including official use by an authorized law enforcement or other
agency, or at sale at public auction or by competitive bidding.
(i) The final order of the court shall provide that the proceeds of any such sale shall be used
to pay the reasonable expenses of the forfeiture proceedings, seizure, storage, maintenance of
custody, advertising and notice, and all proceeds shall be deposited into the general fund of the
municipality in which such crime was committed.
(2) No forfeiture under this section shall extinguish a perfected security interest held by a
creditor in the property at the time of the filing of the forfeiture action. In all actions where a final
order results in forfeiture of property subject to a perfected security interest, possession of the
property shall revert to the creditor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005469
========
LC005469 - Page 2 of 3